Louisiana, session 2026, HB255.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:313(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§313. Wearing of masks, hoods, or other facial disguises in public places prohibited;
penalty; exceptions; permit to conduct Mardi Gras festivities; wearing of
hoods, masks, or disguises by sex offenders
* * *
F. The court may, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, sentence
any person who is convicted of any of the following to an additional two years of
imprisonment, with or without hard labor, when, at the time of the commission of the
crime, the offender was wearing a mask, hood, or other facial disguise with the intent
to conceal or hide his identity:
(1) R.S. 14:28 (Inciting a felony)
(2) R.S. 14:34.2 (Battery of a police officer)
(3) R.S. 14:34.6 (Disarming of a peace officer)
(4) R.S. 14:37.2 (Aggravated assault upon a peace officer)
(5) R.S. 14:37.3 (Unlawful use of a laser on a police officer)
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-162 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 255
(6) R.S. 14:37.6 (Aggravated assault with a motor vehicle upon a peace
officer)
(7) R.S. 14:51 (Aggravated arson)
(8) R.S. 14:51.1 (Injury by arson)
(9) R.S. 14:52 (Simple arson)
(10) R.S. 14:52.1 (Simple arson of a religious building)
(11) R.S. 14:52.2 (Negligent arson)
(12) R.S. 14:55 (Aggravated criminal damage to property)
(13) R.S. 14:56 (Simple criminal damage to property)
(14) R.S. 14:56.4 (Criminal damage to property by defacing with graffiti)
(15) R.S. 14:56.5 (Criminal damage to historic buildings or landmarks by
defacing with graffiti)
(16) R.S. 14:57.1 (Vandalizing, tampering with, or destroying a crime
camera system)
(17) R.S. 14:59 (Criminal mischief)
(18) R.S. 14:61 (Unauthorized entry of a critical infrastructure)
(19) R.S. 14:61.1 (Criminal damage to a critical infrastructure)
(20) R.S. 14:62.5 (Looting)
(21) R.S. 14:63.3 (Entry on or remaining in places or on land after being
forbidden)
(22) R.S. 14:63.4 (Aiding and abetting others to enter or remain on premises
where forbidden)
(23) R.S. 14:96 (Aggravated obstruction of a highway of commerce)
(24) R.S. 14:97 (Simple obstruction of a highway of commerce)
(25) R.S. 14:100.1 (Obstructing public passages)
(26) R.S. 14:102.8 (Injuring or killing of a police animal)
(27) R.S. 14:103 (Disturbing the peace)
(28) R.S. 14:108 (Resisting an officer)
(29) R.S. 14:108.1 (Flight from an officer; aggravated flight from an officer)
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-162 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 255
(30) R.S. 14:108.2 (Resisting a police officer with force or violence)
(31) R.S. 14:109 (Approaching a peace officer lawfully engaged in law
enforcement duties)
(32) R.S. 14:115 (Criminal anarchy)
(33) R.S. 14:116 (Flag desecration)
(34) R.S. 14:116.1 (Flag burning)
(35) R.S. 14:128.1 (Terrorism)
(36) R.S. 14:128.2 (Aiding others in terrorism)
(37) R.S. 14:225 (Institutional vandalism)
(38) R.S. 14:327 (Obstructing a fireman)
(39) R.S. 14:329.1 (Riot)
(40) R.S. 14:329.2 (Inciting to riot)